Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 Inmate Policies
42-1-11.
Notification of crime victim of impending release of offender from imprisonment.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Crime” means an act committed in this state which constitutes any violation of Chapter 5 of Title 16, relating to crimes against persons; Chapter 6 of Title 16, relating to sexual offenses; Article 1, Article 1A, or Article 3 of Chapter 7 of Title 16, relating to burglary, home invasion, and arson; or Article 1 or Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 16, relating to offenses involving theft and armed robbery.

“Crime against the person or sexual offense” means any crime provided for in Chapter 5 or 6 of Title 16.

“Custodial authority” means the commissioner of corrections if the offender is in the physical custody of the state, or the sheriff if the offender is incarcerated in a county jail, or the warden if the offender is incarcerated in a county correctional institution.

“Offender” means a person sentenced to a term of incarceration in a state or county correctional institution.

If the identity of a victim of a crime has been verified by the prosecuting attorney, who has, at the request of such victim, mailed a letter to the custodial authority requesting that the victim be notified of a change in the custodial status of an offender, then the custodial authority shall make a good faith effort to notify the victim that the offender is to be released from imprisonment, including release on extended furlough; transferred to work release; released by mandatory release upon expiration of sentence; or has escaped from confinement; or if the offender has died. The good faith effort to notify the victim must occur prior to the release or transfer noted in this subsection. For a victim of a felony crime against the person or sexual offense for which the offender was sentenced to a term of imprisonment of more than 18 months, the good faith effort to notify the victim must occur no later than ten days before the offender’s release from imprisonment, transfer to or release from work release, or as soon thereafter as is practical in situations involving emergencies.

The notice given to a victim of a crime against a person or sexual offense shall include the conditions governing the offender’s release or transfer and either the identity of the corrections agent or the community supervision officer who will be supervising the offender’s release or a means to identify the agency that will be supervising the offender’s release. The custodial authority complies with this Code section upon mailing the notice of impending release to the victim at the address which the victim has most recently provided to the custodial authority in writing.

If an offender escapes from imprisonment or incarceration, including from release on extended furlough or work release, the custodial authority shall make all reasonable efforts to notify a victim who has requested notice of the offender’s release under subsection (b) of this Code section within six hours after discovering the escape, or as soon thereafter as is practical, and shall also make reasonable efforts to notify the victim within 24 hours after the offender is apprehended or as soon thereafter as is practical. In emergencies, telephone notification for the victim will be attempted and the results documented in the offender’s central file.

All identifying information regarding the victim, including the victim’s request and the notice provided by the custodial authority, shall be confidential and accessible only to the victim. It is the responsibility of the victim to provide the custodial authority with a current address.

A designated official in the Department of Corrections, the county correctional facility, and the sheriff’s office shall coordinate the receipt of all victim correspondence and shall monitor staff responses to requests for such notification from victims of crime.

The custodial authority shall not be liable for a failure to notify the victim.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1278, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 385, § 3; Ga. L. 2014, p. 426, § 11/HB 770; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-64/HB 310.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the middle of paragraph (a)(1), inserted “, Article 1A,” and inserted “, home invasion,”.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “shall include” for “must include” near the middle, and substituted “community supervision officer” for “county officer” in the middle. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1278, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Code section shall become effective six months after the effective date of an appropriations Act containing a specific appropriation to fund the provisions of this Act. Partial funding was provided by the General Assembly at the 1995 session. Additional funding was approved by the General Assembly at the 1997 session. Additional funding was appropriated by the General Assembly at the 1997 session.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 enactment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 176 (1993).

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 158 (1995).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-1-11.1.
Alien prisoners eligible for deportation; cooperation with federal deportation program; waiver of extradition rights; transportation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alien prisoner” means a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States who is serving a sentence under the supervision of the department.

“Board” means the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

“Release on a reprieve” means being released on a reprieve with a detainer to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

The department and board shall establish a process and agreements among multiple state, local, and federal agencies for the implementation of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement Rapid Removal of Eligible Parolees Accepted for Transfer (REPAT) Program or similar federal program, by whatever name, for the purpose of deporting alien prisoners in the state prison system who are eligible for deportation.

The department shall include as a part of the intake process a procedure to identify alien prisoners eligible for deportation. The department shall coordinate with the federal authorities to determine an alien prisoner’s immigration status and eligibility for removal. The identity and information regarding alien prisoners eligible for deportation shall be provided expeditiously to the board, and the board shall then consider such alien prisoner for a release on a reprieve. Alien prisoners who would otherwise be ineligible for parole shall not become eligible by reason of eligibility for a release on a reprieve.

Upon an alien prisoner’s acceptance into the federal deportation program, the board may establish a tentative release month for the alien prisoner to be transferred into federal custody.

No tentative parole release month based on a release on a reprieve shall be set until the alien prisoner is otherwise eligible for parole. No tentative parole release month shall be set for any date prior to the effective date of a final deportation removal order.

The board shall provide notice and obtain acknowledgment in writing that notice was given to each alien prisoner who is eligible for a release on a reprieve that illegal reentry into the United States shall subject such alien prisoner to being returned to the custody of the department to complete the remainder of his or her court-imposed sentence. Prior to granting a release on a reprieve, the alien prisoner shall make a knowing, voluntary, and intelligent waiver in writing of all rights of extradition which would challenge the alien prisoner’s parole revocation and return the alien prisoner to the department to complete the remainder of his or her sentence in the event such alien prisoner violates a condition of the release on a reprieve.

An alien prisoner shall not be eligible for a release on a reprieve if the federal authorities determine that the alien prisoner’s removal is not reasonably foreseeable.

The department shall maintain exclusive control and responsibility for the custody and transportation of alien prisoners to and from federal facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-11.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 263, § 2/SB 136.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 263, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that alien prisoners subject to deportation are not released from prison into the Georgia community. It is further the intent of this legislative body to reduce the costs and expenses of operating state prisons by reducing the number of alien prisoners incarcerated in the Georgia penal system and to expedite the deportation process of such prisoners. Moreover, Georgia should support the rearrest and revocation of parole of any alien prisoner who reenters the United States in violation of a release on a reprieve with a detainer to United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. The General Assembly intends to require state agencies to take part in the Immigration and Customs Enforcement Rapid Removal of Eligible Parolees Accepted for Transfer (REPAT) Program funded and operated by the United States government and take all measures to fully cooperate and communicate with state, local, and federal agencies for the implementation of such program.”

42-1-11.2.
Advice on employment of attorney prohibited; penalty.

No employee of a penal institution shall give advice to an inmate regarding the name or the employment of an attorney at law in any case where the inmate is confined in a penal institution or receive any sum of money paid as fees or otherwise to attorneys at law in a criminal case or cases against any inmate with which they may be connected in any capacity.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-11.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-2/HB 1176.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

42-1-11.3.
Treatment of pregnant and postpartum female inmates.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Custodian” means warden, sheriff, jailer, deputy sheriff, police officer, or any other law enforcement officer.

“Immediate postpartum period” means the six-week period following childbirth unless extended by a physician due to complications.

“Officer in charge” means the individual who is responsible for the supervision of a penal institution.

“Penal institution” means any place of confinement for juvenile or adult individuals accused of, convicted of, or adjudicated for violating a law of this state or an ordinance of a political subdivision of this state.

“Pregnant woman” means a woman whose pregnancy has been verified by a pregnancy test or through a medical examination conducted by a physician.

“Woman” means a juvenile or adult female who is confined in a penal institution.

A pregnant woman shall not be required to squat or cough during a strip search conducted by a custodian during the second or third trimester of pregnancy.

A pregnant woman shall not be required to undergo any vaginal examination unless prescribed and performed by a licensed health care professional.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and notwithstanding Code Section 42-5-58, a custodian shall not use handcuffs, waist shackles, leg irons, or restraints of any kind on a pregnant woman who is in the second or third trimester of pregnancy, in labor, or in delivery, or on a woman in the immediate postpartum period.

A woman who is in the immediate postpartum period may only be restrained using wrist handcuffs with her wrists held in front of her body and only if there are compelling grounds to believe that such woman presents:

An immediate and serious threat of harm to herself, staff, or others; or

A substantial flight risk and cannot be reasonably contained by other means.

If a custodian uses wrist handcuffs on a woman who is in the immediate postpartum period under an exception provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the circumstances for and details of such exception shall be documented within two days of the incident. Such information shall include the nature of the circumstances and the length of time of such use of restraints. The documentation shall be reviewed by the officer in charge and retained by the penal institution for reporting purposes.

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the use of medical restraints by a licensed health care professional to ensure the medical safety of a pregnant woman.

A pregnant woman or woman who is in the immediate postpartum period shall not be placed in solitary confinement, in administrative segregation, or for medical observation in a solitary confinement setting; provided, however, that this shall not prevent the placement of such woman in a cell or hospital room by herself.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that a pregnant woman who is temporarily held in a county jail pending transfer to a state penal institution be transferred as expeditiously as possible. The Department of Corrections and a sheriff overseeing a county jail in which a pregnant woman is incarcerated shall make all reasonable efforts to facilitate such transfer. This subsection shall not apply to a pregnant woman who has been sentenced to a county jail by a judge.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-11.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 761, § 1/HB 345.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.